Hawaii, session 2026, HB1739.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 46, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§46-     County-designated transit-oriented development zones; transit-supportive densities; county regulation; prohibition.  (a)  Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, in any county-designated transit-oriented development zone, development of transit-supportive densities shall be allowed; provided that no county ordinance, rule, regulation, development standard, zoning provision, or other land use control shall be enacted that restricts the development of such transit-supportive densities. (b) Any county ordinance, rule, regulation development standard, zoning provision, or other land use control that is inconsistent with section 206E-246 shall be preempted, void, and of no force or effect to the extent of the inconsistency." SECTION 2.  Chapter 206E, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to part X to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§206E-     Transit-oriented development infrastructure improvement program areas; transit-supportive densities; county regulation; prohibition.  (a) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, in any transit-oriented development infrastructure improvement program area established pursuant to section 206E-43, development of transit-supportive densities shall be allowed; provided that no county ordinance, rule, regulation, development standard, zoning provision, or other land use control shall be enacted that restricts the development of such transit-supportive densities. (b) Any county ordinance, rule, regulation development standard, zoning provision, or other land use control that is inconsistent with section 206E-246 shall be preempted, void, and of no force or effect to the extent of the inconsistency." SECTION 3.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________